Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2143
Art therapy; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Mental Health Practice Act shall be construed to prevent or restrict any person who has obtained a credential under the Uniform Credentialing Act from engaging in any activity or practice, including use of art and art materials, that is consistent with such person's licensed scope of practice and professional training, as long as such person does not use the title licensed art therapist or certified art therapist.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 19.